Nebraska, session 109, LB248.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 71-1910, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
71-1910 For purposes of the Child Care Licensing Act, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(1) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services; and
(2)(a) Program means the provision of services in lieu of parental
supervision for children under thirteen years of age for compensation, either
directly or indirectly, on the average of less than twelve hours per day, but
more than two hours per week, and includes any employer-sponsored child care,
family child care home, child care center, school-age child care program,
school-age services pursuant to section 79-1104, or preschool or nursery
school.
(b) Program does not include casual care at irregular intervals, a
recreation camp as defined in section 81-15,271, a recreation facility, center,
or program operated by a political or governmental subdivision pursuant to the
authority provided in section 13-304, classes or services provided by a
religious organization other than child care or a preschool or nursery school,
a preschool program conducted in a school approved pursuant to section 79-318,
services provided only to school-age children during the summer and other
extended breaks in the school year, or foster care as defined in section
71-1901, or a program on a military base or federal property or a facility
licensed as a family child care provider by a branch of the United States
Department of Defense or the United States Coast Guard.
Sec. 2. Original section 71-1910, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is repealed.
-1-